ex1-morphology/finnish.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Multichar_Symbols

+Noun                ! POS
+Verb                ! POS

!! LEXICON Verb-Inflection-I

+Infinitive-A
+1Person_Singular
+2Person_Singular
+3Person_Singular
+1Person_Plural
+2Person_Plural
+3Person_Plural
+Imperative

!! LEXICON Noun-Inflection-I

+Nominative
+Genitive
+Inessive
+Adessive
+Allative
+Elative
+Ablative
+Essive
+Translative
+Illative

 %>                        !! morpheme boundary (Apertium)
!! +                         !! morpheme boundary

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Root

Noun-stems ;
Verb-stems ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Clitics

# ;
+Interrogative:⛒ko   # ;
!+Emphatic:⛒kin   # ;
!+Negative:⛒kaan   # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Verb-Inflection-I

+Infinitive-A:%>a       Clitics ;
+1Person_Singular:%>n   Clitics ;
+2Person_Singular:%>t   Clitics ;
+3Person_Singular:%>V   Clitics ;
+1Person_Plural:%>mme   Clitics ;
+2Person_Plural:%>tte   Clitics ;
+3Person_Plural:%>vat   Clitics ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Noun-Inflection-I

!! OK too: 
!! +Nominative:    # ; !!                       

+Nominative:%>0    Clitics ; !!                    
+Genitive:%>n      Clitics ; !! of                 
+Inessive:%>ssa    Clitics ; !! in                 
+Adessive:%>lla    Clitics ; !! at                 
+Allative:%>lle    Clitics ; !! onto               
+Elative:%>sta     Clitics ; !! out-of from-within 
+Ablative:%>lta    Clitics ; !! from               
+Essive:%>na       Clitics ; !! as                 
+Translative:%>ksi Clitics ; !! as-into            
+Illative:%>Vn     Clitics ; !! into               


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Noun-stems

talo+Noun:talo      Noun-Inflection-I ;   ! (house)
pala+Noun:pala      Noun-Inflection-I ;   ! (piece)
savu+Noun:savu      Noun-Inflection-I ;   ! (smoke)
ovi+Noun:ovI        Noun-Inflection-I ;   ! (door) !! oveko
katto+Noun:katto    Noun-Inflection-I ;   ! (roof)

isä+Noun:isä        Noun-Inflection-I ;  ! (father)
hissi+Noun:hissi    Noun-Inflection-I ;  ! (lift)
kivi+Noun:kivI      Noun-Inflection-I ;  ! (stone)
pöytä+Noun:pöytä    Noun-Inflection-I ;  ! (table)

kukko+Noun:kukko    Noun-Inflection-I ;  ! (rooster)
lakko+Noun:lakko    Noun-Inflection-I ;  ! (strike)

kaappi+Noun:kaappi  Noun-Inflection-I ;  ! (closet)
lappi+Noun:lappi    Noun-Inflection-I ;  ! (lapland)

tapa+Noun:tapa      Noun-Inflection-I ;  ! (habit)
lapa+Noun:lapa      Noun-Inflection-I ;  ! (shoulder)

leuka+Noun:leuka    Noun-Inflection-I ;  ! (chin)

poika+Noun:poika    Noun-Inflection-I ;  ! (boy)
aika+Noun:aika Noun-Inflection-I ; ! ( time)

puku+Noun:puku      Noun-Inflection-I ;  ! (dress/suit)

jälki+Noun:jälki    Noun-Inflection-I ;  ! (trace)
kyky+Noun:kyky      Noun-Inflection-I ;  ! (ability)


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Verb-stems

palaa+Verb:pala         Verb-Inflection-I ;   ! (burn)
ajaa+Verb:aja           Verb-Inflection-I ;   ! (drive)
nukkua+Verb:nukku       Verb-Inflection-I ;   ! (sleep)

kysyä+Verb:kysy         Verb-Inflection-I ;  ! (ask)
kestää+Verb:kestä       Verb-Inflection-I ;  ! (last)
heittää+Verb:heittä     Verb-Inflection-I ;  ! (berate)
löytää+Verb:löytä       Verb-Inflection-I ;  ! (find)
nokkia+Verb:nokki       Verb-Inflection-I ;  ! (peck)
hankkia+Verb:hankki     Verb-Inflection-I ;  ! (fetch/get)

tappaa+Verb:tappa       Verb-Inflection-I ;  ! (kill)
appaa+Verb:appa         Verb-Inflection-I ;  ! (devour)

riipiä+Verb:riipi       Verb-Inflection-I ;  ! (strip)
hiipiä+Verb:hiipi       Verb-Inflection-I ;  ! (sneak)

kokea+Verb:koke         Verb-Inflection-I ;  ! (experience)
lukea+Verb:luke         Verb-Inflection-I ;  ! (read)
